Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB466.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301 of the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 301. As used in this act:* * *(20) "Political contribution" means money allocated by an employe organization or an entity directly or indirectly 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 controlled by an employe organization to be used for:(i) a contribution, as defined in section 1621(b) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the "Pennsylvania Election Code"; or(ii) a contribution, as defined in 52 U.S.C. § 30101(8) (relating to definitions).Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 707. (a) A public employer may not deduct from the wages of a public employe money to be used for a political contribution, except as required by a valid collective bargaining agreement entered into between the public employer and an employe organization prior to the effective date of this subsection. A collective bargaining agreement entered into, renewed or extended on or after the effective date of this subsection may not contain any provision authorizing or requiring the deduction of a political contribution.(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to wages earned by a public employe who is not permitted to strike under this act or the act of June 24, 1968 (P.L.237, No.111), referred to as the Policemen and Firemen Collective Bargaining Act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0466PN0449 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021